New York, session 2025-2026, A10001.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The several amounts named in this section or so much there- 2 of as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated by the 3 appropriations, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be paid as 4 hereinafter provided, to the respective public officers and for the 5 fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 6 GENERAL FUND / STATE OPERATIONS 7 STATE PURPOSES ACCOUNT 8 THE LEGISLATURE 9 OFFICE OF THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR 10 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ......................................... 361,869 11 -------------- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD12651-02-6 2 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service-regular ......................... 347,234 3 -------------- 4 Amount available for personal service .......... 347,234 5 -------------- 6 For personal service of employees. 7 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 8 Supplies and materials ............................ 14,635 9 -------------- 10 Amount available for nonpersonal service ........ 14,635 11 -------------- 12 THE SENATE 13 For services and expenses of the Senate (including liabil- 14 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2026), including travel 15 outside the state, in accordance with the following 16 schedule ................................................. 129,741,856 17 ============== 18 SCHEDULE 19 PERSONAL SERVICE 20 For payment of salaries to Members, 63, 21 pursuant to section 5 of the legislative 22 law .......................................... 8,946,000 23 For payment of allowances to members desig- 24 nated by the temporary president, pursuant 25 to the schedule of such allowances set 26 forth in section 5-a of the legislative 27 law .......................................... 1,289,500 28 For personal service of employees and for 29 temporary and expert services of members' 30 offices and of standing committees: 31 Personal service-regular ...................... 47,296,834 32 For personal service of employees and for 33 temporary and expert services for senate 34 operations: 35 Personal service-regular ...................... 45,251,911 36 For personal service of employees and for 37 temporary and expert services for the 38 senate student program office: 39 Personal service-regular ......................... 489,128 40 Temporary service .............................. 1,367,525 41 -------------- 42 Amount available for personal service .... 104,640,898 43 -------------- 3 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ......................... 5,365,595 3 Travel ......................................... 1,554,141 4 Micellaneous contractual services, includ- 5 ing, but not limited to, childcare 6 expenses incurred by members of the New 7 York State Senate in the execution of 8 their duties of public office ............... 15,557,989 9 Equipment ...................................... 2,623,233 10 -------------- 11 Amount available for nonpersonal service .. 25,100,958 12 -------------- 13 THE ASSEMBLY 14 For services and expenses (including liabilities incurred 15 prior to April 1, 2026), including travel outside the 16 state, in accordance with the following schedule ......... 150,838,779 17 ============== 18 SCHEDULE 19 PERSONAL SERVICE 20 Members, 150, payment of salaries pursuant 21 to section 5 of the legislative law ......... 21,300,000 22 For payment of allowances to members desig- 23 nated by the speaker pursuant to the 24 provisions of section 5-a of the legisla- 25 tive law ..................................... 1,592,500 26 For personal service of employees and for 27 temporary and expert services of members' 28 offices and of standing committees and 29 subcommittees: 30 Personal service-regular ...................... 37,000,000 31 Temporary service .............................. 3,500,000 32 For personal service of employees and for 33 temporary and expert services for adminis- 34 trative and program support operations: 35 Personal service-regular ...................... 45,046,279 36 Temporary service ................................ 600,000 37 For the Assembly Intern and Youth Partic- 38 ipation Program for personal service of 39 employees and for temporary and expert 40 services: 41 Personal service-regular ......................... 400,000 42 Temporary service .............................. 1,400,000 43 -------------- 44 Amount available for personal service ...... 110,838,779 45 -------------- 4 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ......................... 4,500,000 3 Travel ......................................... 3,500,000 4 Miscellaneous contractual services ............ 25,500,000 5 Equipment ...................................... 6,500,000 6 -------------- 7 Amount available for nonpersonal service .... 40,000,000 8 -------------- 9 ASSEMBLY WAYS AND MEANS COMMITTEE 10 For services and expenses (including liabilities incurred 11 prior to April 1, 2026), including travel outside the 12 state, in accordance with the following schedule ........... 7,719,724 13 ============== 14 PERSONAL SERVICE 15 Personal service-regular ....................... 6,934,724 16 Temporary service ................................ 120,000 17 -------------- 18 Amount available for personal service ........ 7,054,724 19 -------------- 20 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 21 Supplies and materials ........................... 350,000 22 Travel ............................................. 5,000 23 Contractual services ............................. 300,000 24 Equipment ......................................... 10,000 25 -------------- 26 Amount available for nonpersonal service ....... 665,000 27 -------------- 28 SENATE AND ASSEMBLY JOINT ENTITIES 29 LEGISLATIVE ETHICS COMMISSION 30 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics 31 Commission (including liabilities incurred prior to 32 April 1, 2026) pursuant to section 80 of the legislative 33 law in accordance with the following schedule ................ 499,252 34 ============== 35 PERSONAL SERVICE 36 Personal service-regular ......................... 481,085 37 -------------- 38 Amount available for personal service .......... 481,085 39 -------------- 5 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ............................. 1,667 3 Travel ............................................ 15,000 4 Contractual services ............................... 1,000 5 Equipment ............................................ 500 6 -------------- 7 Amount available for nonpersonal service ........ 18,167 8 -------------- 9 NATIONAL CONFERENCE OF STATE LEGISLATURES 10 For a contribution to the National Conference of State 11 Legislatures in accordance with the following schedule ....... 492,075 12 ============== 13 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 14 Contractual services ............................. 492,075 15 -------------- 16 Amount available for nonpersonal service ....... 492,075 17 -------------- 18 LEGISLATIVE HEALTH SERVICE 19 For services and expenses for the operation of the legis- 20 lative health service (including liabilities incurred 21 prior to April 1, 2026) in accordance with the following 22 schedule ..................................................... 278,371 23 ============== 24 PERSONAL SERVICE 25 Personal service-regular ......................... 250,671 26 -------------- 27 Amount available for personal service .......... 250,671 28 -------------- 29 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 30 Supplies and materials ............................ 25,700 31 Contractual services ............................... 1,000 32 Equipment .......................................... 1,000 33 -------------- 34 Amount available for nonpersonal service ........ 27,700 35 -------------- 36 LEGISLATIVE LIBRARY 37 For services and expenses for the operation of the legis- 38 lative library (including liabilities incurred prior to 39 April 1, 2026) in accordance with the following schedule 40 ............................................................ 1,051,762 41 ============== 6 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service-regular ......................... 672,762 3 -------------- 4 Amount available for personal service .......... 672,762 5 -------------- 6 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 7 Supplies and materials ........................... 100,000 8 Contractual services ............................. 274,000 9 Equipment .......................................... 5,000 10 -------------- 11 Amount available for nonpersonal service ....... 379,000 12 -------------- 13 LEGISLATIVE MESSENGER SERVICE 14 For services and expenses for the operation of the legis- 15 lative messenger service (including liabilities incurred 16 prior to April 1, 2026) in accordance with the following 17 schedule ................................................... 1,196,186 18 ============== 19 PERSONAL SERVICE 20 Personal service-regular ....................... 1,194,186 21 -------------- 22 Amount available for personal service ........ 1,194,186 23 -------------- 24 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 25 Supplies and materials ............................. 2,000 26 -------------- 27 Amount available for nonpersonal service ......... 2,000 28 -------------- 29 LEGISLATIVE BILL DRAFTING COMMISSION 30 For services and expenses, temporary and special services, 31 and for expenses of maintenance and operation, including 32 travel outside of the state, in accordance with the 33 following schedule ........................................ 20,451,710 34 ============== 35 PERSONAL SERVICE 36 Personal service-regular ...................... 15,030,916 37 Temporary service ................................ 169,240 38 -------------- 39 Amount available for personal service ....... 15,200,156 40 -------------- 7 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ........................... 332,021 3 Travel ............................................ 50,577 4 Contractual services ........................... 4,710,163 5 Equipment ........................................ 158,793 6 -------------- 7 Amount available for nonpersonal service ..... 5,251,554 8 -------------- 9 LEGISLATIVE TASK FORCE ON DEMOGRAPHIC RESEARCH AND REAPPORTIONMENT 10 For services and expenses (including liabilities 11 incurred prior to April 1, 2026) of the task force for 12 senate purposes in accordance with the following sche- 13 dule ....................................................... 472,141 14 -------------- 15 PERSONAL SERVICE 16 Personal service-regular ......................... 461,739 17 -------------- 18 Amount available for personal service .......... 461,739 19 -------------- 20 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 21 Travel ............................................. 3,000 22 Contractual services ............................... 7,402 23 -------------- 24 Amount available for nonpersonal service ........ 10,402 25 -------------- 26 For services and expenses (including liabilities incurred 27 prior to April 1, 2026) of the task force for assembly 28 purposes in accordance with the following schedule ........... 467,623 29 -------------- 30 PERSONAL SERVICE 31 Personal service-regular ......................... 456,423 32 -------------- 33 Amount available for personal service .......... 456,423 34 -------------- 35 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 36 Supplies and materials ............................. 1,000 37 Travel ............................................. 1,000 38 Contractual services ............................... 7,200 39 Equipment .......................................... 2,000 40 -------------- 8 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 Amount available for nonpersonal service ........ 11,200 2 -------------- 3 For services and expenses (including liabilities incurred 4 prior to April 1, 2026) of the task force for joint 5 operations in accordance with the following schedule ....... 1,490,485 6 -------------- 7 PERSONAL SERVICE 8 Personal service-regular ....................... 1,154,485 9 -------------- 10 Amount available for personal service ........ 1,154,485 11 -------------- 12 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 13 Supplies and materials ............................ 17,000 14 Travel ............................................. 5,000 15 Contractual services ............................. 106,000 16 Equipment ........................................ 208,000 17 -------------- 18 Amount available for nonpersonal service ....... 336,000 19 -------------- 20 INDEPENDENT REDISTRICTING COMMISSION 21 For services and expenses (including liabilities incurred 22 prior to April 1, 2026) of the Independent Redistricting 23 Commission pursuant to section 5-b of article 3 of the 24 constitution. Notwithstanding any other provision of law 25 to the contrary and within the amount made available 26 therefore by appropriation, the chair and vice-chair of 27 the Independent Redistricting Commission may receive up 28 to a state fiscal year salary of ten thousand dollars 29 and five thousand dollars for all other members of the 30 the Independent Redistricting Commission. The Independ- 31 ent Redistricting Commission shall, upon an affirmative 32 vote of the members of the commission, determine its 33 expenditures and shall make public the expenditure of 34 the funds appropriated to the Commission that it deter- 35 mines to make. Notwithstanding any other provision of 36 law to the contrary, the members, officers, and employ- 37 ees of the Independent Redistricting Commission shall be 38 deemed employees for the purposes of Section 17 and 39 Section 19 of the Public Officers Law. Notwithstanding 40 any other provision of law to the contrary, the members, 41 officers, and employees of the Independent Redistricting 42 Commission shall be deemed "legislative employees" 43 pursuant to section 73-a of the Public Officers Law of 44 the legislative law in accordance with the following 45 schedule ................................................... 1,163,900 46 -------------- 9 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service-regular ......................... 633,900 3 -------------- 4 Amount available for personal service .......... 633,900 5 -------------- 6 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 7 Supplies and materials ............................ 10,000 8 Travel ............................................ 10,000 9 Contractual services ............................. 500,000 10 Equipment ......................................... 10,000 11 -------------- 12 Amount available for nonpersonal service ....... 530,000 13 -------------- 14 SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS -- OTHER 15 LEGISLATIVE COMPUTER SERVICES FUND 16 For services and expenses of the Legislative Computer 17 Services Fund in accordance with the following schedule .... 1,500,000 18 -------------- 19 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 20 Contractual services ........................... 1,000,000 21 Equipment ........................................ 500,000 22 -------------- 23 Amount available for nonpersonal service ..... 1,500,000 24 -------------- 25 SENATE RECYCLABLE MATERIALS, 26 INFORMATION SERVICES AND CONFERENCE FUND 27 For services and expenses of the Senate Recyclable Materi- 28 als, Information Services and Conference Fund in accord- 29 ance with the following schedule .............................. 50,000 30 -------------- 31 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 32 Supplies and materials ............................ 50,000 33 -------------- 34 Amount available for nonpersonal service ........ 50,000 35 -------------- 36 ASSEMBLY RECYCLABLE MATERIALS, 37 INFORMATION SERVICES AND CONFERENCE FUND 38 For services and expenses of the Assembly Recyclable Mate- 39 rials, Information Services and Conference Fund in 40 accordance with the following schedule ........................ 50,000 41 -------------- 10 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ............................ 50,000 3 -------------- 4 Amount available for nonpersonal service ........ 50,000 5 -------------- 6 GRANTS AND BEQUESTS FUND 7 LEGISLATURE 8 THE SENATE 9 For services and expenses relative to restoration of the 10 Senate Chamber and other purposes as funded by non-state 11 grants in accordance with the following schedule ............. 250,000 12 -------------- 13 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 14 Contractual services ............................. 250,000 15 -------------- 16 Amount available for nonpersonal service ....... 250,000 17 -------------- 18 THE ASSEMBLY 19 For services and expenses relative to restoration of the 20 Assembly Chamber and other purposes as funded by non- 21 state grants in accordance with the following schedule ....... 250,000 22 -------------- 23 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 24 Contractual services ............................. 250,000 25 -------------- 26 Amount available for nonpersonal service ....... 250,000 27 -------------- 11 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 THE JUDICIARY 2 § 2. The several amounts named in this section, or so much thereof as 3 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated by the appro- 4 priations, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be paid as herein- 5 after provided, to the respective public officers and for the several 6 purposes specified, which amounts shall be available for the fiscal year 7 beginning April 1, 2026. 8 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all moneys paid into the 9 state treasury pursuant to subdivision 1 of section 465 of the judiciary 10 law shall thereupon be transferred to the attorney licensing fund. 11 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the unified court system 12 may enter into one or more contracts with the center for justice inno- 13 vation for services in relation to various judiciary programs and, with 14 the approval of the chief administrator of the courts filed with the 15 comptroller, may expend up to $15 million of the funds provided by this 16 section for such services pursuant to such contract or contracts. 17 For services and expenses including travel outside the 18 state and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 19 April 1, 2026 in accordance with the following schedule: 20 STATE OPERATIONS 2026-27 21 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 22 General Fund - State and Local ..... 2,639,143,000 47,823,000 23 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 19,000,000 35,000,000 24 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 176,325,000 20,958,000 25 ---------------- ---------------- 26 All Funds ........................ 2,834,468,000 103,781,000 27 ================ ================ 28 SCHEDULE 29 Notwithstanding any provision of law, the amount appropri- 30 ated for any program or fund within a major purpose 31 within this schedule may be increased or decreased in 32 any amount by interchange with any other program or fund 33 in any other major purpose, or with any appropriation in 34 section three of this act, with the approval of the 35 chief administrator of the courts. 36 COURTS OF ORIGINAL JURISDICTION (54302) .................. 2,377,301,000 37 -------------- 38 General Fund / State Operations 39 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service - regular (50100) ......... 1,957,395,000 3 Personal service - temporary (50200) ........... 6,504,000 4 Personal service - holiday / overtime 5 compensation (50300) ........................ 59,547,000 6 -------------- 7 Amount available for personal service .... 2,023,446,000 8 -------------- 9 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 10 Supplies and Materials (57000) ................ 18,709,000 11 Travel (54000) ................................. 6,639,000 12 Contractual Services (51000) ................. 230,864,000 13 Equipment (56000) .............................. 2,599,000 14 -------------- 15 Amount available for nonpersonal service ... 258,811,000 16 -------------- 17 Program account subtotal ............... 2,282,257,000 18 -------------- 19 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 20 New York City County Clerks' Operations Offset Fund - 23151 21 For services and expenses as provided by 22 section 94-a of the state finance law. 23 PERSONAL SERVICE 24 Personal service - regular (50100) ............ 28,775,000 25 Personal service - holiday/overtime compen- 26 sation (50300) .................................. 36,000 27 -------------- 28 Amount available for personal service ....... 28,811,000 29 -------------- 30 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 31 Supplies and Materials (57000) ................... 165,000 32 Travel (54000) ..................................... 9,000 33 Contractual Services (51000) ..................... 923,000 34 -------------- 35 Amount available for nonpersonal service ..... 1,097,000 36 -------------- 37 Program fund subtotal ..................... 29,908,000 38 -------------- 39 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 40 Judiciary Data Processing Offset Fund - 23201 41 For services and expenses as provided by 42 section 94-b of the state finance law. 13 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service - regular (50100) ............ 40,693,000 3 Personal service - holiday / overtime 4 compensation (50300) ........................... 214,000 5 -------------- 6 Amount available for personal service ....... 40,907,000 7 -------------- 8 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 9 Travel (54000) ................................... 112,000 10 -------------- 11 Amount available for nonpersonal service ....... 112,000 12 -------------- 13 Program fund subtotal ..................... 41,019,000 14 -------------- 15 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 16 Court Facilities Incentive Aid Fund - 22501 17 PERSONAL SERVICE 18 Personal service - regular (50100) ............... 460,000 19 -------------- 20 Amount available for personal service .......... 460,000 21 -------------- 22 Program fund subtotal ........................ 460,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Federal / State Operations 25 Federal Operating Grants Fund 26 Federal Miscellaneous Grants (Operating) Account - 25366 27 MAINTENANCE UNDISTRIBUTED 28 For services and expenses including travel 29 outside the state and the payment of 30 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 31 2026 (51000) ................................. 9,500,000 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal ................... 9,500,000 34 -------------- 35 Special Revenue Funds - Federal / State Operations 36 Federal Grants - Health and Human Services - 25120 37 MAINTENANCE UNDISTRIBUTED 38 For services and expenses including travel 39 outside the state and the payment of lia- 40 bilities incurred prior to April 1, 2026 41 (51000) ...................................... 9,500,000 42 -------------- 14 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 Program account subtotal ................... 9,500,000 2 -------------- 3 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 4 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund - 22008 5 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 6 Supplies and Materials (57000) ..................... 4,000 7 Travel (54000) ..................................... 1,000 8 Contractual Services (51000) ................... 2,870,000 9 -------------- 10 Amount available for nonpersonal service ..... 2,875,000 11 -------------- 12 Program fund subtotal ...................... 2,875,000 13 -------------- 14 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 15 Attorney Licensing Fund - 22012 16 PERSONAL SERVICE 17 Personal service - regular (50100) ............. 1,424,000 18 -------------- 19 Amount available for personal service ...... 1,424,000 20 -------------- 21 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 22 Supplies and Materials (57000) ..................... 4,000 23 Travel (54000) ..................................... 1,000 24 Contractual Services (51000) ..................... 103,000 25 -------------- 26 Amount available for nonpersonal service ....... 108,000 27 -------------- 28 Program fund subtotal ...................... 1,532,000 29 -------------- 30 Special Revenue Funds - Other / Asset Forfeiture 31 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund - 22249 32 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 33 Contractual Services (51000) ..................... 250,000 34 -------------- 35 Amount available for nonpersonal service ....... 250,000 36 -------------- 37 Program fund subtotal ........................ 250,000 38 -------------- 39 COURT OF APPEALS (54306) .................................... 19,427,000 40 -------------- 41 General Fund / State Operations 15 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 State Purposes Account - 10050 2 PERSONAL SERVICE 3 Personal service - regular (50100) ............ 18,007,000 4 Personal service - holiday / overtime 5 compensation (50300) ........................... 215,000 6 -------------- 7 Amount available for personal service ....... 18,222,000 8 -------------- 9 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 10 Supplies and Materials (57000) ................... 396,000 11 Travel (54000) ................................... 398,000 12 Contractual Services (51000) ..................... 411,000 13 -------------- 14 Amount available for nonpersonal service ..... 1,205,000 15 -------------- 16 Program account subtotal .................. 19,427,000 17 -------------- 18 APPELLATE COURT OPERATIONS (54300) ......................... 110,701,000 19 -------------- 20 General Fund / State Operations 21 State Purposes Account - 10050 22 PERSONAL SERVICE 23 Personal service - regular (50100) ........... 105,595,000 24 Personal service - temporary (50200) ........... 1,947,000 25 Personal service - holiday / overtime 26 compensation (50300) ........................... 247,000 27 -------------- 28 Amount available for personal service ...... 107,789,000 29 -------------- 30 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 31 Supplies and Materials (57000) ................. 1,166,000 32 Travel (54000) ................................... 322,000 33 Contractual Services (51000) ................... 1,424,000 34 -------------- 35 Amount available for nonpersonal service ..... 2,912,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal ................. 110,701,000 38 -------------- 39 APPELLATE AUXILIARY OPERATIONS (54301) ..................... 286,308,000 40 -------------- 41 General Fund / State Operations 42 State Purposes Account - 10050 16 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service - regular (50100) ............ 18,686,000 3 -------------- 4 Amount available for personal service ....... 18,686,000 5 -------------- 6 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 7 Supplies and Materials (57000) ................... 160,000 8 Travel (54000) ................................... 224,000 9 Contractual Services (51000) ................. 180,124,000 10 -------------- 11 Amount available for nonpersonal service ... 180,508,000 12 -------------- 13 Program account subtotal ................. 199,194,000 14 -------------- 15 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 16 Attorney Licensing Fund - 22012 17 For services and expenses funded from fees 18 required pursuant to section 468-a of the 19 judiciary law. 20 PERSONAL SERVICE 21 Personal service - regular (50100) ............ 38,732,000 22 Personal service - holiday / overtime 23 compensation (50300) ............................ 22,000 24 -------------- 25 Amount available for personal service ....... 38,754,000 26 -------------- 27 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 28 Supplies and Materials (57000) ................... 283,000 29 Travel (54000) ................................... 186,000 30 Contractual Services (51000) ................... 8,008,000 31 -------------- 32 Amount available for nonpersonal service ..... 8,477,000 33 -------------- 34 Program fund subtotal ..................... 47,231,000 35 -------------- 36 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 37 Indigent Legal Services Fund - 23551 38 For services and expenses as provided by 39 section 98-b of the state finance law. 17 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Contractual Services (51000) .................. 25,000,000 3 -------------- 4 Amount available for nonpersonal service .... 25,000,000 5 -------------- 6 Program fund subtotal ..................... 25,000,000 7 -------------- 8 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 9 Federal IV-E Fund - 22263 10 PERSONAL SERVICE 11 Personal service - regular (50100) ............... 656,000 12 -------------- 13 Amount available for personal service .......... 656,000 14 -------------- 15 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 16 Supplies and Materials (57000) ................... 100,000 17 Travel (54000) ................................... 100,000 18 Contractual Services (51000) .................. 13,927,000 19 Equipment (56000) ................................ 100,000 20 -------------- 21 Amount available for nonpersonal service .... 14,227,000 22 -------------- 23 Program fund subtotal ..................... 14,883,000 24 -------------- 25 ADMINISTRATION AND GENERAL SUPPORT (81001) .................. 29,435,000 26 -------------- 27 General Fund / State Operations 28 State Purposes Account - 10050 29 PERSONAL SERVICE 30 Personal service - regular (50100) ............ 22,838,000 31 Personal service - temporary (50200) ............. 818,000 32 Personal service - holiday/overtime compen- 33 sation (50300) .................................. 33,000 34 -------------- 35 Amount available for personal service ....... 23,689,000 36 -------------- 37 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 38 Supplies and Materials (57000) ................... 123,000 39 Travel (54000) ................................... 613,000 40 Contractual Services (51000) ................... 3,139,000 41 -------------- 18 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 Amount available for nonpersonal service ..... 3,875,000 2 -------------- 3 Program account subtotal .................. 27,564,000 4 -------------- 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 6 Court Facilities Incentive Aid Fund - 22501 7 PERSONAL SERVICE 8 Personal service - regular (50100) ............. 1,777,000 9 Personal service - holiday/overtime compen- 10 sation (50300) .................................. 90,000 11 -------------- 12 Amount available for personal service ........ 1,867,000 13 -------------- 14 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 15 Supplies and Materials (57000) ..................... 1,000 16 Travel (54000) ..................................... 3,000 17 -------------- 18 Amount available for nonpersonal service ......... 4,000 19 -------------- 20 Program fund subtotal ...................... 1,871,000 21 -------------- 22 LAWYERS' FUND FOR CLIENT PROTECTION (54333) ................. 11,296,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 25 Lawyers' Fund for Client Protection of the State of New 26 York - 21301 27 For expenses associated with the operation 28 of the Lawyers' Fund for Client Protection 29 of the State of New York; provided that, 30 notwithstanding any other provision of law 31 to the contrary, and in accordance with 32 section 4 of the state finance law, the 33 state comptroller is hereby authorized and 34 directed to transfer, upon the request of 35 the chief administrator of the courts, up 36 to $3,750,000 from the Special Revenue 37 Funds - Other / State Operations Attorney 38 Licensing Fund to the Lawyers' Fund for 39 Client Protection of the State of New York 40 on or before March 31, 2027. 41 PERSONAL SERVICE 42 Personal service - regular (50100) ............... 664,000 43 -------------- 19 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 Amount available for personal service .......... 664,000 2 -------------- 3 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 4 Supplies and Materials (57000) ..................... 5,000 5 Travel (54000) .................................... 23,000 6 Contractual Services (51000) .................. 10,604,000 7 -------------- 8 Amount available for nonpersonal service .... 10,632,000 9 -------------- 10 Program fund subtotal ..................... 11,296,000 11 -------------- 20 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27 2 For payment according to the following schedule: 3 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 4 General Fund ....................... 229,500,000 141,000,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 135,418,000 20,000,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 364,918,000 161,000,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 AID TO LOCALITIES .......................................... 364,918,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund / Aid to Localities 13 Local Assistance Account - 10000 14 For services and expenses associated with 15 the civil legal services program (54554) ... 179,500,000 16 For services and expenses associated with 17 the justice court assistance program 18 (54325) ...................................... 3,000,000 19 For suballocation to the office of indigent 20 legal services, at the direction of the 21 chief administrator of the courts, for 22 payment pursuant to law to New York city, 23 pursuant to an agreement with such city, 24 for services and expenses related to 25 implementation of caseload standards for 26 institutional providers representing indi- 27 gent clients in criminal cases in such 28 city. Notwithstanding any other provision 29 of law, monies received by the office of 30 indigent legal services pursuant to this 31 suballocation may be distributed to New 32 York city only to the extent necessary to 33 enable compliance with section 127.7 of 34 the rules of the chief administrator of 35 the courts (22 NYCRR §127.7). 36 For services and expenses associated with 37 the criminal caseload reduction program 38 (54327) ..................................... 47,000,000 39 -------------- 40 Program account subtotal ................. 229,500,000 41 -------------- 42 Special Revenue Funds - Other / Aid to Localities 43 Court Facilities Incentive Aid Fund - 22501 21 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 For expenses necessary to implement the 2 provisions of law relating to the furnish- 3 ing of court facilities and the provisions 4 of section 219-a of the judiciary law; 5 provided that, notwithstanding any other 6 provision of law to the contrary, and in 7 accordance with section 4 of the state 8 finance law, where monies in the court 9 facilities incentive aid fund, including 10 such monies as may be transferred thereto 11 pursuant to subdivision 6 of section 94 of 12 the state finance law, are insufficient to 13 meet vouchers presented for payment 14 charged to this appropriation or for 15 transfers made pursuant to paragraph (b) 16 of subdivision 2 of such section, the 17 state comptroller is hereby authorized and 18 directed to transfer, upon the request of 19 the chief administrator of the courts, 20 sufficient monies to meet such vouchers or 21 to permit such transfers from the General 22 Fund to the Court Facilities Incentive Aid 23 Fund on or before March 31, 2027. 24 For services and expenses associated with 25 the court facilities incentive aid program 26 (54325) .................................... 135,418,000 27 -------------- 28 Program fund subtotal .................... 135,418,000 29 -------------- 22 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 2 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 3 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 4 following schedule: 5 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 6 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 60,000,000 54,050,000 7 ---------------- ---------------- 8 All Funds ........................ 60,000,000 54,050,000 9 ================ ================ 10 SCHEDULE 11 IT, FACILITY RENOVATION, AND SECURITY INITIATIVE PROGRAM 12 (CCP) ..................................................... 60,000,000 13 -------------- 14 Capital Projects Funds - Other 15 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 16 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 17 For services and expenses related to the 18 acquisition and development of technology, 19 including but not limited to equipment, 20 software and services (52012601)(54308) ..... 49,000,000 21 For services and expenses related to alter- 22 ations and improvements for health and 23 safety in courthouses (52022601)(54317) ...... 7,000,000 24 For expenses related to the acquisition of 25 equipment required upon general facility 26 renovation or upgrade (52032601)(54310) ...... 4,000,000 23 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 GENERAL STATE CHARGES 2026-27 2 For payment according to the following schedule: 3 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 4 General Fund ....................... 1,131,117,000 249,213,000 5 Special Revenue Funds .............. 61,894,000 12,187,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 1,193,011,000 261,400,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 GENERAL STATE CHARGES (54332) ............................ 1,193,011,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund / State Operations 13 State Purposes Account - 10050 14 FRINGE BENEFITS 15 For Fringe Benefits (60000) ................ 1,131,117,000 16 -------------- 17 Program account subtotal ............... 1,131,117,000 18 -------------- 19 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 20 Attorney Licensing Fund - 22012 21 FRINGE BENEFITS 22 For Fringe Benefits (60000) ................... 20,003,000 23 -------------- 24 Program fund subtotal ..................... 20,003,000 25 -------------- 26 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 27 Court Facilities Incentive Aid Fund - 22501 28 FRINGE BENEFITS 29 For Fringe Benefits (60000) .................... 1,185,000 30 -------------- 31 Program fund subtotal ...................... 1,185,000 32 -------------- 33 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 34 Lawyers' Fund for Client Protection - 21301 35 FRINGE BENEFITS 36 For Fringe Benefits (60000) ...................... 357,000 37 -------------- 24 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 Program fund subtotal ........................ 357,000 2 -------------- 3 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 4 New York City County Clerks' Operations Offset Fund - 5 23151 6 FRINGE BENEFITS 7 For Fringe Benefits (60000) ................... 17,365,000 8 -------------- 9 Program fund subtotal ..................... 17,365,000 10 -------------- 11 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 12 Judiciary Data Processing Offset Fund - 23201 13 FRINGE BENEFITS 14 For Fringe Benefits (60000) ................... 22,628,000 15 -------------- 16 Program fund subtotal ..................... 22,628,000 17 -------------- 18 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 19 Federal IV-E Fund - 22263 20 FRINGE BENEFITS 21 For Fringe Benefits (60000) ..................... 356,000 22 -------------- 23 Program fund subtotal ........................ 356,000 24 -------------- 25 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 REAPPROPRIATIONS 2 § 3. The several amounts named in this section, or so much thereof as 3 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated being the 4 unexpended balances of a prior year's appropriation, are hereby reappro- 5 priated from the same funds and made available for the same purposes as 6 the prior year's appropriation, unless amended herein, for the state 7 fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 8 THE JUDICIARY 9 STATE OPERATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 10 SCHEDULE 11 COURTS OF ORIGINAL JURISDICTION 12 General Fund / State Operations 13 State Purposes Account 14 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 15 Personal service - regular ... 1,843,234,000 ....... (re. $42,332,000) 16 Personal service - temporary ... 4,692,000 ............ (re. $108,000) 17 Personal service - holiday / overtime compensation ................... 18 55,835,000 ........................................ (re. $1,282,000) 19 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 20 New York City County Clerks' Operations Offset Fund 21 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 22 Personal service - regular ... 25,468,000 ............. (re. $585,000) 23 Personal service - holiday / overtime compensation ................... 24 1,000 ................................................. (re. $1,000) 25 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 26 Judiciary Data Processing Offset Fund 27 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 28 Personal service - regular ... 41,888,000 ............. (re. $939,000) 29 Personal service - holiday / overtime compensation ................... 30 220,000 .............................................. (re. $28,000) 31 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 32 Court Facilities Incentive Aid Fund 33 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 34 Personal service - regular ... 469,000 ................. (re. $11,000) 35 Special Revenue Funds - Federal / State Operations 36 Federal Operating Grants Fund 37 Federal Miscellaneous Grants (Operating) Account 38 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 26 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 2 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 ............. 3 9,500,000 ......................................... (re. $9,500,000) 4 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024, as reappropriated by 5 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2025: 6 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 7 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 ............. 8 9,500,000 ......................................... (re. $9,500,000) 9 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2023, as reappropriated by 10 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2025: 11 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 12 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 ............. 13 9,500,000 ......................................... (re. $2,400,000) 14 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2022, as reappropriated by 15 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2025: 16 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 17 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 ............. 18 9,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,600,000) 19 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2021, as reappropriated by 20 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2025: 21 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 22 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 ............. 23 9,500,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 24 Special Revenue Funds - Federal / State Operations 25 Federal Grants - Health and Human Services 26 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 27 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 28 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 ............. 29 9,500,000 ......................................... (re. $9,400,000) 30 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024, as reappropriated by 31 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2025: 32 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 33 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 ............. 34 9,500,000 ........................................... (re. $200,000) 35 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2023, as reappropriated by 36 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2025: 37 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 38 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 ............. 39 9,500,000 ........................................... (re. $150,000) 40 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2022, as reappropriated by 41 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2025: 42 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 43 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 ............. 44 9,500,000 ............................................ (re. $20,000) 27 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2020, as reappropriated by 2 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2025: 3 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 4 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 ............. 5 9,500,000 ........................................... (re. $230,000) 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 7 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 8 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 9 Personal service - regular ... 1,565,000 ............... (re. $36,000) 10 Supplies and Materials ... 4,000 ........................ (re. $4,000) 11 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 12 Contractual Services ... 2,978,000 .................. (re. $2,246,000) 13 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024, as reappropriated by 14 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2025: 15 Contractual Services ... 2,500,000 ..................... (re. $50,000) 16 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2023, as reappropriated by 17 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2025: 18 Contractual Services ... 2,500,000 .................... (re. $500,000) 19 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2022, as reappropriated by 20 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2025: 21 Contractual Services ... 2,500,000 .................... (re. $250,000) 22 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2021, as reappropriated by 23 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2025: 24 Contractual Services ... 2,000,000 .................... (re. $300,000) 25 COURT OF APPEALS 26 General Fund / State Operations 27 State Purposes Account 28 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 29 Personal service - regular ... 16,727,000 ............. (re. $384,000) 30 Personal service - holiday / overtime compensation ................... 31 156,000 ............................................... (re. $4,000) 32 APPELLATE COURT OPERATIONS 33 General Fund / State Operations 34 State Purposes Account 35 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 36 Personal service - regular ... 104,686,000 .......... (re. $2,404,000) 37 Personal service - temporary ... 1,945,000 ............. (re. $45,000) 38 Personal service - holiday / overtime compensation ................... 39 218,000 ............................................... (re. $5,000) 40 APPELLATE AUXILIARY OPERATIONS 28 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 General Fund / State Operations 2 State Purposes Account 3 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 4 Personal service - regular ... 33,247,000 ............. (re. $763,000) 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 6 Attorney Licensing Fund 7 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 8 Personal service - regular ... 23,542,000 ............. (re. $529,000) 9 Personal service - holiday / overtime compensation ................... 10 22,000 ............................................... (re. $12,000) 11 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 12 Federal IV-E Fund 13 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 14 Personal service - regular ... 500,000 ................. (re. $11,000) 15 Supplies and Materials ... 100,000 .................... (re. $100,000) 16 Travel ... 100,000 .................................... (re. $100,000) 17 Contractual Services ... 9,200,000 .................. (re. $8,600,000) 18 Equipment ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000) 19 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024, as reappropriated by 20 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2025: 21 Supplies and Materials ... 1,000,000 ................ (re. $1,000,000) 22 Travel ... 1,000,000 ................................ (re. $1,000,000) 23 Contractual Services ... 7,000,000 .................. (re. $3,500,000) 24 Equipment ... 1,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,000,000) 25 ADMINISTRATION AND GENERAL SUPPORT 26 General Fund / State Operations 27 State Purposes Account 28 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 29 Personal service - regular ... 20,988,000 ............. (re. $482,000) 30 Personal service - temporary ... 580,000 ............... (re. $13,000) 31 Personal service - holiday / overtime compensation ................... 32 46,000 ................................................ (re. $1,000) 33 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 34 Court Facilities Incentive Aid Fund 35 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 36 Personal service - regular ... 1,481,000 ............... (re. $34,000) 37 Personal service - holiday / overtime compensation ................... 38 200,000 ............................................... (re. $5,000) 39 LAWYERS' FUND FOR CLIENT PROTECTION 40 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 29 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 Lawyers' Fund for Client Protection of the State of New York 2 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 3 Personal service - regular ... 716,000 ................. (re. $16,000) 30 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 AID TO LOCALITIES REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 2 Special Revenue Funds - Other / Aid to Localities 3 Court Facilities Incentive Aid Fund 4 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 5 For expenses necessary to implement the provisions of law relating to 6 the furnishing of court facilities and the provisions of section 7 219-a of the judiciary law; provided that, notwithstanding any other 8 provision of law to the contrary, and in accordance with section 4 9 of the state finance law, where monies in the court facilities 10 incentive aid fund, including such monies as may be transferred 11 thereto pursuant to subdivision 6 of section 94 of the state finance 12 law, are insufficient to meet vouchers presented for payment charged 13 to this appropriation or for transfers made pursuant to paragraph 14 (b) of subdivision 2 of such section, the state comptroller is here- 15 by authorized and directed to transfer, upon the request of the 16 chief administrator of the courts, sufficient monies to meet such 17 vouchers or to permit such transfers from the General Fund to the 18 Court Facilities Incentive Aid Fund on or before March 31, 2026. 19 For services and expenses associated with the court facilities incen- 20 tive aid program ... 127,590,000 ................. (re. $20,000,000) 21 General Fund / Aid to Localities 22 Local Assistance Account 23 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 24 For suballocation to the office of indigent legal services, at the 25 direction of the chief administrator of the courts, for payment 26 pursuant to law to New York city, pursuant to an agreement with such 27 city, for services and expenses related to implementation of case- 28 load standards for institutional providers representing indigent 29 clients in criminal cases in such city. Notwithstanding any other 30 provision of law, monies received by the office of indigent legal 31 services pursuant to this suballocation may be distributed to New 32 York city only to the extent necessary to enable compliance with 33 section 127.7 of the rules of the chief administrator of the court 34 (22 NYCRR §127.7). 35 For services and expenses associated with the Criminal Caseload 36 Reduction Program ... 47,000,000 ................. (re. $47,000,000) 37 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024, as reappropriated by 38 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2025: 39 For suballocation to the office of indigent legal services, at the 40 direction of the chief administrator of the courts, for payment 41 pursuant to law to New York city, pursuant to an agreement with such 42 city, for services and expenses related to implementation of case- 43 load standards for institutional providers representing indigent 44 clients in criminal cases in such city. Notwithstanding any other 45 provision of law, monies received by the office of indigent legal 46 services pursuant to this suballocation may be distributed to New 47 York city only to the extent necessary to enable compliance with 48 section 127.7 of the rules of the chief administrator of the court 49 (22 NYCRR §127.7). 31 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 For services and expenses associated with the Criminal Caseload 2 Reduction Program ... 47,000,000 ................. (re. $47,000,000) 3 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2023, as reappropriated by 4 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2025: 5 For suballocation to the office of indigent legal services, at the 6 direction of the chief administrator of the courts, for payment 7 pursuant to law to New York city, pursuant to an agreement with such 8 city, for services and expenses related to implementation of case- 9 load standards for institutional providers representing indigent 10 clients in criminal cases in such city. Notwithstanding any other 11 provision of law, monies received by the office of indigent legal 12 services pursuant to this suballocation may be distributed to New 13 York city only to the extent necessary to enable compliance with 14 section 127.7 of the rules of the chief administrator of the court 15 (22 NYCRR §127.7). 16 For services and expenses associated with the Criminal Caseload 17 Reduction Program ... 47,000,000 ................. (re. $47,000,000) 32 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 CAPITAL PROJECTS REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 2 COURTHOUSE IMPROVEMENTS (CCP) 3 Capital Projects Fund 4 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 5 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2007, as reappropriated by 6 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2025: 7 For expenses associated with the acquisition of and improvements to a 8 training academy in Kings County for the training of court security 9 personnel (52JT0707) ... 33,700,000 ............... (re. $1,000,000) 10 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 51, 11 section 3, of the laws of 2012, as reappropriated by chapter 51, 12 section 3, of the laws of 2025: 13 For expenses associated with the acquisition of and improvements to a 14 training academy in Kings County for the training of court security 15 personnel (52JT0707) ... 24,200,000 ............... (re. $1,000,000) 16 IT, FACILITY RENOVATION, AND SECURITY INITIATIVE PROGRAM (CCP) 17 Preservation of Facility Purpose 18 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024, as reappropriated by 19 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2025: 20 For expenses associated with the improvements to Appellate 1st Divi- 21 sion Facilities ... 2,300,000 ..................... (re. $2,300,000) 22 For expenses associated with the improvements to Appellate 2nd Divi- 23 sion Facilities ... 9,700,000 ..................... (re. $9,700,000) 24 Capital Projects Funds - Other 25 Capital Projects Fund 26 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 27 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 28 For services and expenses related to the acquisition and development 29 of technology, including but not limited to equipment, software and 30 services (52012501) ... 42,000,000 ............... (re. $30,000,000) 31 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements for 32 health and safety in courthouses (52022501) ........................ 33 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,000,000) 34 For expenses related to the acquisition of equipment required upon 35 general facility renovation or upgrade (52032501) .................. 36 3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 37 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024, as reappropriated by 38 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2025: 39 For services and expenses related to the acquisition and development 40 of technology, including but not limited to equipment, software and 41 services (52012401) ... 30,000,000 ................ (re. $5,000,000) 33 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements for 2 health and safety in courthouses (52022401) ........................ 3 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 4 For expenses related to the acquisition of equipment required upon 5 general facility renovation or upgrade (52032401) .................. 6 3,000,000 ............................................ (re. $50,000) 34 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 GENERAL STATE CHARGES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 2 General Fund / State Operations 3 State Purposes Account 4 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 5 For Fringe Benefits ... 995,119,000 ............... (re. $249,213,000) 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 7 Attorney Licensing Fund 8 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 9 For Fringe Benefits ... 11,433,000 .................. (re. $2,863,000) 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 11 Court Facilities Incentive Aid Fund 12 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 13 For Fringe Benefits ... 985,000 ....................... (re. $247,000) 14 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 15 Lawyers' Fund for Client Protection 16 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 17 For Fringe Benefits ... 350,000 ........................ (re. $88,000) 18 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 19 New York City County Clerks' Operations Offset Fund 20 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 21 For Fringe Benefits ... 14,780,000 .................. (re. $3,701,000) 22 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 23 Judiciary Data Processing Offset Fund 24 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 25 For Fringe Benefits ... 20,945,000 .................. (re. $5,245,000) 26 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 27 Federal IV-E Fund 28 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2025: 29 For Fringe Benefits ... 173,000 ........................ (re. $43,000) 35 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 § 4. The several amounts named herein, or so much thereof as shall be 2 sufficient to accomplish the purpose designated, being the unexpended 3 balances of prior year's appropriations, are hereby reappropriated from 4 the same funds and made available for the same purposes as the prior 5 year's appropriations, unless amended herein, for the state fiscal year 6 beginning April 1, 2026. 7 For the purpose of complying with the state finance law, the chapter, 8 section, and year of the last act reappropriating a former original 9 appropriation or any part thereof was, unless otherwise indicated, chap- 10 ter 51, section 4, of the laws of 2025. Where the full text of law being 11 continued is not shown, leader dots ... are used. However, unless a 12 change is clearly indicated by the use of brackets [ ] for deletions and 13 italics for additions, the purposes, amounts, funding source and all 14 other aspects pertinent to each item of appropriation shall be as last 15 appropriated. 16 THE LEGISLATURE 17 GENERAL FUND / STATE OPERATIONS 18 STATE PURPOSES ACCOUNT 19 THE SENATE 20 SCHEDULE 21 PERSONAL SERVICE 22 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 23 For payment of salaries to Members, 63, pursuant to section 5 of the 24 legislative law ... 8,946,000 ..................... (re. $2,430,372) 25 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 26 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 27 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .. (re. $1,176,250) 28 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 29 services of members' offices and of standing committees: 30 Personal service-regular ... 44,476,284 ............ (re. $16,564,064) 31 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 32 services for senate operations: 33 Personal service-regular ... 42,612,932 ............ (re. $18,441,434) 34 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 35 services for the senate student program office: 36 Personal service-regular ... 410,556 .................. (re. $348,855) 37 Temporary service ... 1,134,716 ....................... (re. $686,243) 38 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 39 For payment of salaries to Members, 63, pursuant to section 5 of the 40 legislative law ... 8,946,000 ....................... (re. $436,923) 41 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 42 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 43 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .. (re. $1,138,500) 44 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 45 services of members' offices and of standing committees: 46 Personal service-regular ... 42,047,475 ............. (re. $4,972,395) 36 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 2 services for senate operations: 3 Personal service-regular ... 40,150,238 ............. (re. $8,520,123) 4 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 5 For payment of salaries to Members, 63, pursuant to section 5 of the 6 legislative law ... 8,946,000 ........................ (re. $19,491) 7 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 8 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 9 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .. (re. $1,138,500) 10 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 11 services of members' offices and of standing committees: 12 Personal service-regular ... 39,818,672 ............ (re. $12,384,176) 13 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 14 services for senate operations: 15 Personal service-regular ... 37,926,450 ............ (re. $16,018,660) 16 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 17 For payment of salaries to Members, 63, pursuant to section 5 of the 18 legislative law ... 6,930,000 ....................... (re. $220,537) 19 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 20 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 21 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .. (re. $1,138,500) 22 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 23 services of members' offices and of standing committees: 24 Personal service-regular ... 38,211,908 ............. (re. $3,310,132) 25 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 26 services for senate operations: 27 Personal service-regular ... 36,398,610 ............. (re. $7,386,918) 28 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 29 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 30 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 31 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .. (re. $1,138,500) 32 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 33 services of members' offices and of standing committees: 34 Personal service-regular ... 34,949,668 ............. (re. $2,229,283) 35 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 36 services for senate operations: 37 Personal service-regular ... 33,189,185 ............. (re. $6,113,182) 38 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 39 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 40 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 41 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .. (re. $1,138,500) 42 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 43 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 44 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 45 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .. (re. $1,138,500) 46 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 37 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 2 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 3 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .... (re. $541,377) 4 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 5 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 6 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 7 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .... (re. $297,125) 8 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 9 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 10 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 11 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .... (re. $285,250) 12 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 13 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 14 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 15 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .... (re. $284,625) 16 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 17 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 18 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 19 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .... (re. $310,625) 20 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 21 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 22 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 23 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .... (re. $290,125) 24 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 25 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 26 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 27 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .... (re. $907,875) 28 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 29 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 30 Supplies and materials ... 6,365,595 ................ (re. $6,365,595) 31 Travel ... 1,554,141 ................................ (re. $1,554,141) 32 Miscellaneous contractual services, including, but not limited to, 33 childcare expenses incurred by members of the New York State Senate 34 in the execution of their duties of public office .................. 35 14,557,989 ........................................ (re. $8,807,875) 36 Equipment ... 2,623,233 ............................. (re. $2,623,233) 37 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 38 Supplies and materials ... 9,365,595 ................ (re. $9,360,553) 39 Travel ... 1,554,141 ................................ (re. $1,554,141) 40 Miscellaneous contractual services, including, but not limited to, 41 childcare expenses incurred by members of the New York State Senate 42 in the execution of their duties of public office .................. 43 11,557,989 ........................................ (re. $1,841,721) 44 Equipment ... 2,623,233 ............................... (re. $290,270) 38 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 2 Supplies and materials ... 9,365,595 ................ (re. $6,648,915) 3 Travel ... 1,554,141 ................................ (re. $1,554,140) 4 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 11,557,989 ... (re. $1,006,011) 5 Equipment ... 2,623,233 ............................. (re. $1,362,936) 6 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 7 Supplies and materials ... 9,365,595 .................... (re. $5,000) 8 Travel ... 1,554,141 ................................ (re. $1,554,141) 9 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 11,557,989 ... (re. $5,563,914) 10 Equipment ... 2,623,233 ............................... (re. $606,602) 11 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 12 Travel ... 1,554,141 ................................ (re. $1,554,141) 13 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 11,557,989 ... (re. $5,236,155) 14 Equipment ... 2,623,233 ............................. (re. $1,268,188) 15 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 16 Travel ... 1,554,141 ................................ (re. $1,544,479) 17 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 11,557,989 ..... (re. $792,666) 18 Equipment ... 2,623,233 ............................. (re. $1,383,000) 19 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 20 Travel ... 1,554,141 ................................ (re. $1,229,303) 21 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 11,557,989 ....... (re. $5,000) 22 Equipment ... 2,623,233 ............................. (re. $2,100,659) 23 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 24 Equipment ... 2,623,233 ............................. (re. $2,070,462) 25 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 26 Equipment ... 2,623,233 ............................... (re. $428,387) 27 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 28 Equipment ... 2,623,233 ................................ (re. $28,189) 29 THE ASSEMBLY 30 SCHEDULE 31 PERSONAL SERVICE 32 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 33 Members, 150, payment of salaries pursuant to section 5 of the legis- 34 lative law ... 21,300,000 ......................... (re. $5,766,108) 35 For payment of allowances to members designated by the speaker pursu- 36 ant to the provisions of section 5-a of the legislative law ........ 37 1,592,500 ......................................... (re. $1,419,548) 38 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 39 services of members' offices and of standing committees and subcom- 40 mittees: 41 Personal service-regular ... 35,500,000 ............ (re. $12,729,234) 42 Temporary service ... 2,500,000 ..................... (re. $1,609,546) 39 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 2 services for administrative and program support operations: 3 Personal service-regular ... 43,300,732 ............ (re. $17,092,512) 4 Temporary service ... 500,000 ......................... (re. $323,208) 5 For the Assembly Intern and Youth Participation Program for personal 6 service of employees and for temporary and expert services: 7 Personal service-regular ... 425,000 .................. (re. $188,445) 8 Temporary service ... 1,400,000 ..................... (re. $1,286,733) 9 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 10 Members, 150, payment of salaries pursuant to section 5 of the legis- 11 lative law ... 21,300,000 ........................... (re. $929,254) 12 For payment of allowances to members designated by the speaker pursu- 13 ant to the provisions of section 5-a of the legislative law ... 14 1,592,500 ......................................... (re. $1,353,000) 15 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 16 services of members' offices and of standing committees and subcom- 17 mittees: 18 Personal service-regular ... 34,000,000 ............... (re. $972,874) 19 Temporary service ... 2,500,000 ....................... (re. $115,011) 20 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 21 services for administrative and program support operations: 22 Personal service-regular ... 41,648,990 ............. (re. $5,225,193) 23 Temporary service ... 450,000 ......................... (re. $121,872) 24 For the Assembly Intern and Youth Participation Program for personal 25 service of employees and for temporary and expert services: 26 Personal service-regular ... 425,000 .................. (re. $114,668) 27 Temporary service ... 1,400,000 ....................... (re. $404,674) 28 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 29 Members, 150, payment of salaries pursuant to section 5 of the legis- 30 lative law ... 21,300,000 ............................ (re. $35,341) 31 For payment of allowances to members designated by the speaker pursu- 32 ant to the provisions of section 5-a of the legislative law ... 33 1,592,500 ......................................... (re. $1,353,000) 34 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 35 services of members' offices and of standing committees and subcom- 36 mittees: 37 Personal service-regular ... 32,500,000 ............... (re. $800,000) 38 Temporary service ... 2,500,000 ....................... (re. $368,000) 39 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 40 services for administrative and program support operations: 41 Personal service-regular ... 46,048,356 ............. (re. $6,608,164) 42 Temporary service ... 450,000 ........................... (re. $5,000) 43 For the Assembly Intern and Youth Participation Program for personal 44 service of employees and for temporary and expert services: 45 Personal service-regular ... 425,000 .................. (re. $106,136) 46 Temporary service ... 1,400,000 ....................... (re. $198,000) 47 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 48 Members, 150, payment of salaries pursuant to section 5 of the legis- 49 lative law ... 16,500,000 ............................ (re. $79,409) 40 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 For payment of allowances to members designated by the speaker pursu- 2 ant to the provisions of section 5-a of the legislative law ... 3 1,592,500 ......................................... (re. $1,353,000) 4 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 5 services of members' offices and of standing committees and subcom- 6 mittees: 7 Personal service-regular ... 31,262,500 ............. (re. $1,000,000) 8 Temporary service ... 2,357,500 ....................... (re. $380,000) 9 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 10 services for administrative and program support operations: 11 Personal service-regular ... 44,533,477 ............. (re. $3,900,000) 12 Temporary service ... 350,000 .......................... (re. $20,000) 13 For the Assembly Intern and Youth Participation Program for personal 14 service of employees and for temporary and expert services: 15 Personal service-regular ... 350,000 ................... (re. $18,896) 16 Temporary service ... 1,350,000 ....................... (re. $200,000) 17 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 18 Members, 150, payment of salaries pursuant to section 5 of the legis- 19 lative law ... 16,500,000 ............................ (re. $10,000) 20 For payment of allowances to members designated by the speaker pursu- 21 ant to the provisions of section 5-a of the legislative law ... 22 1,592,500 ......................................... (re. $1,353,000) 23 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 24 services of members' offices and of standing committees and subcom- 25 mittees: 26 Personal service-regular ... 31,262,500 ............. (re. $1,000,000) 27 Temporary service ... 2,357,500 ..................... (re. $1,100,000) 28 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 29 services for administrative and program support operations: 30 Personal service-regular ... 39,923,750 ............. (re. $4,500,000) 31 Temporary service ... 312,625 .......................... (re. $64,000) 32 For the Assembly Intern and Youth Participation Program for personal 33 service of employees and for temporary and expert services: 34 Temporary service ... 1,326,000 ....................... (re. $650,000) 35 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 36 Members, 150, payment of salaries pursuant to section 5 of the legis- 37 lative law ... 16,846,154 ........................... (re. $400,000) 38 For payment of allowances to members designated by the speaker pursu- 39 ant to the provisions of section 5-a of the legislative law ... 40 1,592,500 ......................................... (re. $1,353,430) 41 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 42 services for administrative and program support operations: 43 Personal service-regular ... 37,739,454 ............. (re. $3,200,000) 44 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1992: 45 Members, 150, payment of salaries pursuant to section 5 of the legis- 46 lative law ... ... 8,625,000 ........................ (re. $1,106) 47 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 48 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 49 Supplies and materials ... 4,000,000 ................ (re. $2,781,474) 41 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 Travel ... 3,500,000 ................................ (re. $2,412,745) 2 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 25,000,000 .. (re. $10,020,458) 3 Equipment ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $3,545,632) 4 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 5 Supplies and materials ... 3,500,000 .................. (re. $395,280) 6 Travel ... 3,000,000 .................................. (re. $755,793) 7 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 24,000,000 ... (re. $5,986,478) 8 Equipment ... 4,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,073,544) 9 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 10 Supplies and materials ... 8,000,000 ................ (re. $3,375,453) 11 Travel ... 2,500,000 .................................. (re. $262,745) 12 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 14,000,000 ..... (re. $943,358) 13 Equipment ... 1,800,000 ............................... (re. $722,221) 14 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 15 Supplies and materials ... 7,900,000 ................ (re. $1,005,483) 16 Travel ... 2,900,000 .................................. (re. $906,087) 17 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 13,100,000 ..... (re. $471,566) 18 Equipment ... 1,800,000 ............................... (re. $295,187) 19 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 20 Supplies and materials ... 7,897,500 ................ (re. $1,265,003) 21 Travel ... 2,856,500 ................................ (re. $1,246,317) 22 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 13,080,500 ..... (re. $398,070) 23 Equipment ... 1,753,976 ................................ (re. $97,364) 24 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 25 Supplies and materials ... 7,742,775 ................... (re. $10,000) 26 Travel ... 2,800,570 ................................ (re. $1,200,000) 27 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 12,824,330 ..... (re. $150,000) 28 Equipment ... 1,718,993 ................................. (re. $5,000) 29 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 30 Supplies and materials ... 7,742,775 .................... (re. $9,800) 31 Travel ... 2,800,570 .................................. (re. $500,000) 32 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 12,824,330 ...... (re. $24,933) 33 Equipment ... 1,399,170 ................................. (re. $5,000) 34 ASSEMBLY WAYS AND MEANS COMMITTEE 35 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 36 PERSONAL SERVICE 37 Personal service-regular ... 6,809,878 .............. (re. $3,494,257) 38 Temporary service ... 120,000 ......................... (re. $102,446) 39 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 40 Supplies and materials ... 350,000 .................... (re. $257,724) 41 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $4,486) 42 Contractual services ... 200,000 ...................... (re. $182,215) 42 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 Equipment ... 10,000 .................................... (re. $9,303) 2 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 3 PERSONAL SERVICE 4 Personal service-regular ... 6,617,132 .............. (re. $1,474,345) 5 Temporary service ... 120,000 .......................... (re. $84,000) 6 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 7 Supplies and materials ... 280,000 .................... (re. $109,280) 8 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $4,663) 9 Contractual services ... 140,000 ....................... (re. $17,960) 10 Equipment ... 10,000 .................................... (re. $7,232) 11 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 12 PERSONAL SERVICE 13 Personal service-regular ... 6,341,281 .............. (re. $1,703,909) 14 Temporary service ... 120,000 .......................... (re. $76,615) 15 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 16 Supplies and materials ... 280,000 ..................... (re. $92,292) 17 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $3,932) 18 Contractual services ... 140,000 ....................... (re. $26,942) 19 Equipment ... 10,000 .................................... (re. $6,855) 20 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 21 PERSONAL SERVICE 22 Personal service-regular ... 6,139,648 .............. (re. $1,778,740) 23 Temporary service ... 120,770 ......................... (re. $102,994) 24 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 25 Supplies and materials ... 280,000 ..................... (re. $98,526) 26 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 27 Contractual services ... 140,000 ....................... (re. $26,037) 28 Equipment ... 10,000 .................................... (re. $6,264) 29 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 30 PERSONAL SERVICE 31 Personal service-regular ... 5,945,236 .............. (re. $1,800,000) 32 Temporary service ... 120,770 .......................... (re. $90,000) 33 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 34 Supplies and materials ... 279,400 ..................... (re. $66,937) 43 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 2 Contractual services ... 140,000 ....................... (re. $28,705) 3 Equipment ... 10,000 .................................... (re. $9,500) 4 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 5 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 6 Supplies and materials ... 279,400 .................... (re. $190,000) 7 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 8 Contractual services ... 140,000 ....................... (re. $40,000) 9 Equipment ... 10,000 .................................... (re. $9,000) 10 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 11 PERSONAL SERVICE 12 Temporary service ... 159,000 .......................... (re. $10,000) 13 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 14 Travel ... 29,000 ...................................... (re. $29,000) 15 Equipment ... 49,000 ................................... (re. $46,000) 16 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 17 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 18 Travel ... 29,000 ...................................... (re. $28,050) 19 Equipment ... 49,000 .................................... (re. $9,000) 20 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 21 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 22 Travel ... 29,000 ...................................... (re. $17,700) 23 Equipment ... 49,000 ................................... (re. $24,874) 24 SENATE AND ASSEMBLY JOINT ENTITIES 25 LEGISLATIVE ETHICS COMMISSION 26 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 27 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 28 PERSONAL SERVICE 29 Personal service-regular ... 466,544 .................. (re. $167,270) 30 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 31 Supplies and materials ... 1,667 ........................ (re. $1,667) 32 Travel ... 15,000 ...................................... (re. $15,000) 33 Contractual services ... 1,000 .......................... (re. $1,000) 34 Equipment ... 500 ......................................... (re. $500) 44 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 2 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 3 PERSONAL SERVICE 4 Personal service-regular ... 452,499 ................... (re. $44,136) 5 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 6 Travel ... 6,000 ........................................ (re. $2,090) 7 Contractual services ... 2,000 ............................ (re. $539) 8 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 9 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 10 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 11 PERSONAL SERVICE 12 Personal service-regular ... 434,493 ................... (re. $74,704) 13 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 14 Supplies and materials ... 6,667 ........................ (re. $6,667) 15 Contractual services ... 2,000 .......................... (re. $1,640) 16 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 17 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 18 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 19 PERSONAL SERVICE 20 Personal service-regular ... 421,382 .................. (re. $180,277) 21 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 22 Supplies and materials ... 6,667 ........................ (re. $6,667) 23 Contractual services ... 2,000 .......................... (re. $2,000) 24 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 25 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 26 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 27 PERSONAL SERVICE 28 Personal service-regular ... 396,354 .................. (re. $159,714) 29 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 30 Supplies and materials ... 6,667 ........................ (re. $6,667) 31 Contractual services ... 2,000 .......................... (re. $2,000) 32 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 33 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 34 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 45 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service-regular ... 396,354 .................. (re. $119,077) 3 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 4 Supplies and materials ... 6,667 ........................ (re. $6,667) 5 Contractual services ... 2,000 .......................... (re. $2,000) 6 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 7 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 8 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 9 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 10 Supplies and materials ... 6,667 ........................ (re. $6,667) 11 Contractual services ... 2,000 ............................ (re. $100) 12 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 13 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 14 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 15 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 16 Supplies and materials ... 6,667 ........................ (re. $6,522) 17 Contractual services ... 2,000 .......................... (re. $2,000) 18 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 19 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 20 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 21 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 22 Supplies and materials ... 6,667 ........................ (re. $6,219) 23 Contractual services ... 2,000 ............................ (re. $747) 24 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 25 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 26 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 27 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 28 Supplies and materials ... 6,667 ........................ (re. $6,667) 29 Contractual services ... 2,000 ............................ (re. $100) 30 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 31 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 32 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 33 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 34 Supplies and materials ... 6,667 ........................ (re. $6,463) 35 Contractual services ... 2,000 ............................. (re. $13) 36 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 46 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 2 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 3 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 4 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 5 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 6 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 7 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 8 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 9 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 10 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 11 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 12 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 13 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 14 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 15 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 16 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 17 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 18 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 19 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 20 Equipment ... 1,000 ....................................... (re. $312) 21 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 22 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 23 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 24 Equipment ... 1,000 ....................................... (re. $903) 25 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 26 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 27 358,900 ............................................. (re. $101,522) 28 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2005: 29 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 30 358,900 .............................................. (re. $38,024) 31 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2004: 32 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 33 358,900 ............................................. (re. $176,455) 47 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2003: 2 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 3 358,900 ............................................. (re. $160,441) 4 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2002: 5 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 6 370,000 ............................................. (re. $171,793) 7 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2001: 8 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 9 370,000 ............................................. (re. $179,853) 10 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2000: 11 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 12 370,000 ............................................. (re. $259,141) 13 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1999: 14 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 15 370,000 ............................................. (re. $226,467) 16 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1998: 17 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 18 370,000 ............................................. (re. $257,387) 19 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1997: 20 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 21 370,000 ............................................. (re. $223,096) 22 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1996: 23 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 24 370,000 ............................................. (re. $121,736) 25 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1995: 26 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 27 370,000 ............................................. (re. $126,518) 28 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1994: 29 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 30 370,000 ............................................... (re. $7,895) 31 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1993: 32 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 33 370,000 ............................................. (re. $257,753) 34 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1992: 35 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 36 370,000 ............................................. (re. $339,513) 37 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1991: 38 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 39 410,000 ............................................. (re. $112,640) 40 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1990: 48 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 2 500,000 ............................................. (re. $190,724) 3 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1989: 4 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 5 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $176,562) 6 LEGISLATIVE HEALTH SERVICE 7 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 8 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 9 service. 10 PERSONAL SERVICE 11 Personal service-regular ... 242,563 .................. (re. $147,486) 12 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 13 Supplies and materials ... 25,700 ...................... (re. $25,700) 14 Contractual services ... 1,000 .......................... (re. $1,000) 15 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 16 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 17 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 18 service. 19 PERSONAL SERVICE 20 Personal service-regular ... 234,691 ................... (re. $66,455) 21 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 22 Supplies and materials ... 25,700 ...................... (re. $25,700) 23 Contractual services ... 1,000 .......................... (re. $1,000) 24 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 25 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 26 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 27 service. 28 PERSONAL SERVICE 29 Personal service-regular ... 224,599 ................... (re. $34,887) 30 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 31 Supplies and materials ... 25,700 ...................... (re. $25,700) 32 Contractual services ... 1,000 .......................... (re. $1,000) 33 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 34 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 35 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 36 service. 49 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ... 25,700 ...................... (re. $25,700) 3 Contractual services ... 1,000 ............................ (re. $940) 4 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 5 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 6 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 7 service. 8 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 9 Contractual services ... 1,000 .......................... (re. $1,000) 10 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 11 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 12 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 13 service. 14 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 15 Supplies and materials ... 25,700 ...................... (re. $25,700) 16 Contractual services ... 1,000 ............................ (re. $999) 17 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 18 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 19 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 20 service. 21 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 22 Supplies and materials ... 25,700 ....................... (re. $6,604) 23 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 24 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 25 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 26 service. 27 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 28 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 29 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 30 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 31 service. 32 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 33 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 34 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 35 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 36 service. 50 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 3 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 4 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 5 service. 6 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 7 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 8 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 9 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 10 service. 11 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 12 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 13 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 14 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 15 service. 16 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 17 Equipment ... 1,000 ....................................... (re. $826) 18 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 19 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 20 service. 21 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 22 Equipment ... 1,000 ....................................... (re. $805) 23 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 24 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 25 service. 26 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 27 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 28 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 29 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 30 service. 31 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 32 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 33 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 51 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 2 service. 3 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 4 Equipment ... 1,000 ....................................... (re. $356) 5 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 6 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 7 service. 8 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 9 Equipment ... 1,000 ....................................... (re. $581) 10 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 11 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 12 service. 13 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 14 Equipment ... 1,000 ....................................... (re. $923) 15 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2003: 16 For services and expenses ... ... 178,838 ............ (re. $16,975) 17 LEGISLATIVE LIBRARY 18 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 19 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 20 library. 21 PERSONAL SERVICE 22 Personal service-regular ... 642,128 .................. (re. $414,103) 23 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 24 Supplies and materials ... 100,000 .................... (re. $100,000) 25 Contractual services ... 274,000 ...................... (re. $274,000) 26 Equipment ... 5,000 ..................................... (re. $5,000) 27 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 28 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 29 library. 30 PERSONAL SERVICE 31 Personal service-regular ... 612,386 .................. (re. $306,394) 32 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 33 Supplies and materials ... 126,500 .................... (re. $126,500) 34 Contractual services ... 247,500 ...................... (re. $206,467) 52 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 Equipment ... 5,000 ..................................... (re. $5,000) 2 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 3 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 4 library. 5 PERSONAL SERVICE 6 Personal service-regular ... 574,256 .................. (re. $245,056) 7 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 8 Supplies and materials ... 126,500 .................... (re. $126,500) 9 Equipment ... 5,000 ..................................... (re. $3,150) 10 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 11 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 12 library. 13 PERSONAL SERVICE 14 Personal service-regular ... 546,491 .................. (re. $325,381) 15 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 16 Supplies and materials ... 126,500 .................... (re. $112,277) 17 Equipment ... 5,000 ..................................... (re. $5,000) 18 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 19 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 20 library. 21 PERSONAL SERVICE 22 Personal service-regular ... 493,491 .................. (re. $249,712) 23 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 24 Supplies and materials ... 247,500 .................... (re. $247,337) 25 Equipment ... 5,000 ..................................... (re. $5,000) 26 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 27 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 28 library. 29 PERSONAL SERVICE 30 Personal service-regular ... 493,491 .................. (re. $189,649) 31 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 32 Supplies and materials ... 247,500 .................... (re. $247,500) 33 Equipment ... 5,000 ..................................... (re. $5,000) 53 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 2 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 3 library. 4 PERSONAL SERVICE 5 Personal service-regular ... 476,383 ................... (re. $66,837) 6 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 7 Equipment ... 5,000 ..................................... (re. $5,000) 8 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 9 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 10 library. 11 PERSONAL SERVICE 12 Personal service-regular ... 459,611 ................... (re. $27,422) 13 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 14 Supplies and materials ... 247,500 ..................... (re. $40,110) 15 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 16 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 17 library. 18 PERSONAL SERVICE 19 Personal service-regular ... 443,168 ................... (re. $25,811) 20 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 21 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 22 library. 23 PERSONAL SERVICE 24 Personal service-regular ... 419,221 ................... (re. $11,776) 25 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 26 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 27 library. 28 PERSONAL SERVICE 29 Personal service-regular ... 419,221 ................... (re. $31,994) 30 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 31 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 32 library. 54 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service-regular ... 419,221 ................... (re. $53,702) 3 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 4 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 5 library. 6 PERSONAL SERVICE 7 Personal service-regular ... 419,221 .................. (re. $156,326) 8 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 9 Equipment ... 5,000 ..................................... (re. $5,000) 10 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 11 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 12 library. 13 PERSONAL SERVICE 14 Personal service-regular ... 419,221 ................... (re. $93,699) 15 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 16 Equipment ... 25,000 ................................... (re. $18,218) 17 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 18 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 19 library. 20 PERSONAL SERVICE 21 Personal service-regular ... 419,221 ................... (re. $71,005) 22 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 23 Equipment ... 32,500 ................................... (re. $32,500) 24 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 25 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 26 library. 27 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 28 Equipment ... 32,500 ................................... (re. $32,500) 29 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 30 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 31 library. 55 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Equipment ... 32,800 ................................... (re. $32,800) 3 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 4 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 5 library. 6 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 7 Equipment ... 32,800 ................................... (re. $32,800) 8 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 9 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 10 library. 11 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 12 Equipment ... 32,800 ................................... (re. $32,800) 13 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1999: 14 For services and expenses and for temporary and special services 15 ... ..... 712,635 ................................. (re. $363,453) 16 LEGISLATIVE MESSENGER SERVICE 17 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 18 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 19 ger service. 20 PERSONAL SERVICE 21 Personal service-regular ... 1,159,345 ................ (re. $430,865) 22 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 23 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 24 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 25 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 26 ger service. 27 PERSONAL SERVICE 28 Personal service-regular ... 1,125,519 ................ (re. $200,958) 29 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 30 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 31 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 56 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 2 ger service. 3 PERSONAL SERVICE 4 Personal service-regular ... 1,082,153 ................ (re. $153,251) 5 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 6 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 7 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 8 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 9 ger service. 10 PERSONAL SERVICE 11 Personal service-regular ... 1,050,576 ................. (re. $98,999) 12 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 13 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 14 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 15 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 16 ger service. 17 PERSONAL SERVICE 18 Personal service-regular ... 990,298 .................. (re. $104,699) 19 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 20 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 21 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 22 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 23 ger service. 24 PERSONAL SERVICE 25 Personal service-regular ... 990,298 ................... (re. $77,886) 26 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 27 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $1,429) 28 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 29 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 30 ger service. 31 PERSONAL SERVICE 32 Personal service-regular ... 970,841 ................... (re. $48,368) 57 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 3 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 4 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 5 ger service. 6 PERSONAL SERVICE 7 Personal service-regular ... 951,766 .................... (re. $7,383) 8 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 9 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $1,333) 10 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 11 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 12 ger service. 13 PERSONAL SERVICE 14 Personal service-regular ... 933,065 ................... (re. $24,219) 15 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 16 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $1,907) 17 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 18 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 19 ger service. 20 PERSONAL SERVICE 21 Personal service-regular ... 905,830 .................... (re. $9,648) 22 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 23 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 24 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 25 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 26 ger service. 27 PERSONAL SERVICE 28 Personal service-regular ... 905,830 ................... (re. $54,892) 29 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 30 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 31 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 58 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 2 ger service. 3 PERSONAL SERVICE 4 Personal service-regular ... 905,830 ................... (re. $88,407) 5 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 6 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 .......................... (re. $233) 7 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 8 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 9 ger service. 10 PERSONAL SERVICE 11 Personal service-regular ... 905,830 .................. (re. $105,573) 12 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 13 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 14 ger service. 15 PERSONAL SERVICE 16 Personal service-regular ... 905,830 .................. (re. $141,698) 17 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 18 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 19 ger service. 20 PERSONAL SERVICE 21 Personal service-regular ... 905,830 ................... (re. $71,825) 22 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 23 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 .......................... (re. $113) 24 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 25 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 26 ger service. 27 PERSONAL SERVICE 28 Personal service-regular ... 905,830 ................... (re. $44,703) 29 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 30 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 31 ger service. 32 PERSONAL SERVICE 33 Personal service-regular ... 905,000 ................... (re. $37,839) 59 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 2 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 3 ger service. 4 PERSONAL SERVICE 5 Personal service-regular ... 905,000 ................... (re. $28,486) 6 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 7 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 8 ger service. 9 PERSONAL SERVICE 10 Personal service-regular ... 850,000 ................... (re. $64,837) 11 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 12 Supplies and materials ... 6,106 ........................ (re. $4,476) 13 Equipment ... 1,000 ....................................... (re. $422) 14 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 15 For services and expenses ... ... 841,850 ............ (re. $18,351) 16 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2005: 17 For services and expenses ... ... 817,330 ............ (re. $22,465) 18 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2003: 19 For services and expenses ... ... 688,524 ........... (re. $274,909) 20 LEGISLATIVE BILL DRAFTING COMMISSION 21 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 22 For services and expenses, temporary and special services, and for 23 expenses of maintenance and operation, including travel outside of 24 the state. 25 PERSONAL SERVICE 26 Personal service-regular ... 14,435,235 ............. (re. $4,638,976) 27 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 28 Supplies and materials ... 332,021 .................... (re. $321,649) 29 Travel ... 50,577 ...................................... (re. $50,577) 30 Contractual services ... 4,710,163 .................. (re. $4,710,146) 31 Equipment ... 158,793 ................................. (re. $158,793) 32 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 33 For services and expenses, temporary and special services, and for 34 expenses of maintenance and operation, including travel outside of 35 the state. 60 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service-regular ... 13,856,904 ............... (re. $985,016) 3 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 4 Supplies and materials ... 332,021 .................... (re. $306,685) 5 Travel ... 50,577 ...................................... (re. $50,577) 6 Contractual services ... 4,710,163 .................. (re. $4,709,320) 7 Equipment ... 158,793 ................................. (re. $158,763) 8 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 9 For services and expenses, temporary and special services, and for 10 expenses of maintenance and operation, including travel outside of 11 the state. 12 PERSONAL SERVICE 13 Personal service-regular ... 13,115,454 ............... (re. $675,812) 14 Temporary service ... 169,240 ......................... (re. $169,240) 15 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 16 Supplies and materials ... 332,021 .................... (re. $319,098) 17 Travel ... 50,577 ...................................... (re. $50,577) 18 Contractual services ... 4,710,163 .................. (re. $2,806,628) 19 Equipment ... 158,793 ................................. (re. $158,749) 20 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 21 For services and expenses, temporary and special services, and for 22 expenses of maintenance and operation, including travel outside of 23 the state. 24 PERSONAL SERVICE 25 Personal service-regular ... 12,662,942 ............... (re. $997,464) 26 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 27 Supplies and materials ... 332,021 .................... (re. $311,531) 28 Travel ... 50,577 ...................................... (re. $50,560) 29 Contractual services ... 1,710,163 .................... (re. $753,889) 30 Equipment ... 158,793 ................................. (re. $158,793) 31 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 32 For services and expenses, temporary and special services, and for 33 expenses of maintenance and operation, including travel outside of 34 the state. 35 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 36 Supplies and materials ... 332,021 .................... (re. $271,985) 37 Travel ... 50,577 ...................................... (re. $27,463) 38 Contractual services ... 1,710,163 .................... (re. $900,366) 61 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 Equipment ... 158,793 .................................. (re. $43,109) 2 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 3 For services and expenses, temporary and special services, and for 4 expenses of maintenance and operation, including travel outside of 5 the state. 6 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 7 Supplies and materials ... 332,021 .................... (re. $297,388) 8 Contractual services ... 1,710,163 .................. (re. $1,709,558) 9 Equipment ... 158,793 .................................. (re. $91,667) 10 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 11 For services and expenses, temporary and special services, and for 12 expenses of maintenance and operation, including travel outside of 13 the state. 14 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 15 Contractual services ... 1,710,163 .................. (re. $1,329,900) 16 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 17 For services and expenses, temporary and special services, and for 18 expenses of maintenance and operation, including travel outside of 19 the state. 20 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 21 Contractual services ... 1,710,163 ..................... (re. $31,839) 22 LEGISLATIVE TASK FORCE ON DEMOGRAPHIC RESEARCH AND REAPPORTIONMENT 23 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 24 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 25 purposes. 26 PERSONAL SERVICE 27 Personal service-regular ... 447,987 .................. (re. $244,612) 28 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 29 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 30 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 31 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 32 purposes. 33 PERSONAL SERVICE 34 Personal service - regular ... 442,803 ................ (re. $316,704) 62 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 3 Travel ... 1,000 .......................................... (re. $401) 4 Contractual services ... 7,200 .......................... (re. $7,200) 5 Equipment ... 2,000 ..................................... (re. $2,000) 6 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 7 ations. 8 PERSONAL SERVICE 9 Personal service - regular ... 1,111,073 .............. (re. $466,595) 10 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 11 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $15,081) 12 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $4,419) 13 Contractual services ... 106,000 ....................... (re. $15,767) 14 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $205,314) 15 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 16 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 17 purposes. 18 PERSONAL SERVICE 19 Personal service-regular ... 434,636 .................. (re. $168,577) 20 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 21 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 22 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 23 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 24 purposes. 25 PERSONAL SERVICE 26 Personal service - regular ... 429,580 ................ (re. $270,327) 27 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 28 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 29 Travel ... 1,000 .......................................... (re. $178) 30 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $9,163) 31 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 32 ations. 33 PERSONAL SERVICE 34 Personal service - regular ... 1,068,925 .............. (re. $152,662) 63 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ....................... (re. $5,203) 3 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $4,221) 4 Contractual services ... 106,000 ....................... (re. $36,816) 5 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $176,764) 6 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 7 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 8 purposes. 9 PERSONAL SERVICE 10 Personal service-regular ... 417,519 .................. (re. $156,371) 11 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 12 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 13 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 14 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 15 purposes. 16 PERSONAL SERVICE 17 Personal service - regular ... 412,627 ................ (re. $297,221) 18 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 19 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 .......................... (re. $238) 20 Travel ... 1,000 .......................................... (re. $484) 21 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $9,185) 22 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 23 ations. 24 PERSONAL SERVICE 25 Personal service - regular ... 1,014,889 .............. (re. $128,808) 26 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 27 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $13,748) 28 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $3,975) 29 Contractual services ... 106,000 ....................... (re. $65,009) 30 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $207,436) 31 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 32 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 33 purposes. 34 PERSONAL SERVICE 35 Personal service-regular ... 405,055 .................. (re. $155,795) 64 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 3 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 4 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 5 purposes. 6 PERSONAL SERVICE 7 Personal service-regular ... 400,283 .................. (re. $302,378) 8 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 9 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 10 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 11 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $9,200) 12 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 13 ations. 14 PERSONAL SERVICE 15 Personal service-regular ... 975,543 .................. (re. $116,212) 16 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 17 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ....................... (re. $8,295) 18 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $4,532) 19 Contractual services ... 106,000 ....................... (re. $66,132) 20 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $206,057) 21 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 22 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 23 purposes. 24 PERSONAL SERVICE 25 Personal service-regular ... 381,263 .................. (re. $139,836) 26 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 27 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 28 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 29 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 30 purposes. 31 PERSONAL SERVICE 32 Personal service-regular ... 388,298 .................. (re. $272,533) 65 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 3 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 4 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $9,200) 5 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 6 ations. 7 PERSONAL SERVICE 8 Personal service-regular ... 937,343 .................. (re. $162,592) 9 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 10 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $15,040) 11 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 12 Contractual services ... 106,000 ....................... (re. $74,789) 13 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $203,996) 14 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 15 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 16 purposes. 17 PERSONAL SERVICE 18 Personal service-regular ... 381,263 .................. (re. $129,754) 19 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 20 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 21 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 22 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 23 purposes. 24 PERSONAL SERVICE 25 Personal service-regular ... 380,465 .................. (re. $272,911) 26 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 27 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 28 Travel ... 1,000 .......................................... (re. $931) 29 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $3,905) 30 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 31 ations. 32 PERSONAL SERVICE 33 Personal service-regular ... 912,375 .................. (re. $253,261) 66 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $12,815) 3 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 4 Contractual services ... 106,000 ....................... (re. $73,501) 5 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $205,639) 6 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 7 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 8 purposes. 9 PERSONAL SERVICE 10 Personal service-regular ... 373,583 .................. (re. $284,572) 11 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 12 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $2,576) 13 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 14 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for Assembly 15 purposes. 16 PERSONAL SERVICE 17 Personal service - regular ... 372,785 ................ (re. $280,548) 18 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 19 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 20 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 21 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $9,200) 22 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 23 ations. 24 PERSONAL SERVICE 25 Personal service - regular ... 887,898 ................ (re. $170,474) 26 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 27 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $17,000) 28 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 29 Contractual services ... 106,000 ...................... (re. $105,922) 30 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $206,497) 31 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 32 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 33 purposes. 34 PERSONAL SERVICE 35 Personal service-regular ... 366,054 ................... (re. $37,446) 67 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 3 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 4 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for Assembly 5 purposes. 6 PERSONAL SERVICE 7 Personal service - regular ... 365,256 ................ (re. $279,205) 8 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 9 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 10 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 11 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $9,200) 12 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 13 ations. 14 PERSONAL SERVICE 15 Personal service - regular ... 863,900 ................ (re. $170,654) 16 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 17 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $17,000) 18 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 19 Contractual services ... 106,000 ...................... (re. $105,982) 20 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $208,000) 21 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 22 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 23 purposes. 24 PERSONAL SERVICE 25 Personal service-regular ... 358,673 ................... (re. $22,060) 26 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 27 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 28 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 29 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for Assembly 30 purposes. 31 PERSONAL SERVICE 32 Personal service - regular ... 348,875 ................ (re. $268,022) 33 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 68 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 3 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 4 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $8,450) 5 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 6 ations. 7 PERSONAL SERVICE 8 Personal service - regular ... 831,372 ................. (re. $85,694) 9 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 10 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 11 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $17,000) 12 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 13 Contractual services ... 106,000 ...................... (re. $105,967) 14 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $208,000) 15 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 16 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 17 purposes. 18 PERSONAL SERVICE 19 Personal service-regular ... 347,923 ................... (re. $21,988) 20 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 21 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 22 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 23 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 24 purposes. 25 PERSONAL SERVICE 26 Personal service-regular ... 338,125 .................. (re. $244,319) 27 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 28 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 29 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 30 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 31 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $9,200) 32 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for 33 joint operations. 34 PERSONAL SERVICE 35 Personal service-regular ... 797,109 .................. (re. $236,703) 69 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 2 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 3 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $17,000) 4 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 5 Contractual services ... 106,000 ...................... (re. $104,386) 6 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $208,000) 7 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 8 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 9 purposes. 10 PERSONAL SERVICE 11 Personal service-regular ... 347,923 .................... (re. $9,254) 12 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 13 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $1,386) 14 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 15 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for Assembly 16 purposes. 17 PERSONAL SERVICE 18 Personal service - regular ... 338,125 ................ (re. $228,676) 19 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 20 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 21 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 22 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 23 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $9,200) 24 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 25 ations. 26 PERSONAL SERVICE 27 Personal service - regular ... 797,109 ................. (re. $53,797) 28 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 29 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 30 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $16,410) 31 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 32 Contractual services ... 106,000 ...................... (re. $105,395) 33 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $207,657) 34 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 35 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 36 purposes. 70 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service-regular ... 347,923 .................... (re. $9,095) 3 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 4 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 5 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $5,873) 6 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for Assembly 7 purposes. 8 PERSONAL SERVICE 9 Personal service-regular ... 338,125 .................. (re. $228,794) 10 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 11 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 12 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 13 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 14 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $9,200) 15 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 16 ations. 17 PERSONAL SERVICE 18 Personal service-regular ... 797,109 .................. (re. $735,629) 19 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 20 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 21 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $16,554) 22 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 23 Contractual services ... 106,000 ...................... (re. $105,819) 24 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $208,000) 25 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 26 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 27 purposes. 28 PERSONAL SERVICE 29 Personal service-regular ... 347,923 ................... (re. $65,944) 30 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 31 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 32 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for Assembly 33 purposes. 71 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service-regular ... 338,125 .................. (re. $219,174) 3 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 4 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 5 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 6 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 7 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $9,200) 8 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 9 ations. 10 PERSONAL SERVICE 11 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 12 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 13 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $16,842) 14 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 15 Contractual services ... 106,000 ...................... (re. $106,000) 16 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $208,000) 17 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 18 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 19 purposes. 20 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 21 Travel ... 6,000 ....................................... (re. $1,051) 22 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 23 purposes. 24 PERSONAL SERVICE 25 Personal service-regular ... 338,125 .................. (re. $208,382) 26 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 27 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 28 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 29 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 30 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $8,525) 31 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 32 ations. 33 PERSONAL SERVICE 34 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 72 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $16,605) 3 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 4 Contractual services ... 106,000 ...................... (re. $105,948) 5 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $208,000) 6 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 7 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 8 purposes. 9 PERSONAL SERVICE 10 Personal service-regular ... 338,125 .................. (re. $213,372) 11 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 12 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 13 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 14 Contractual services ... 10,200 ........................ (re. $10,200) 15 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 16 ations. 17 PERSONAL SERVICE 18 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 19 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 20 Supplies and materials ... 14,000 ...................... (re. $13,905) 21 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 22 Contractual services ... 109,000 ...................... (re. $103,000) 23 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $208,000) 24 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 25 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 26 purposes. 27 PERSONAL SERVICE 28 Personal service-regular ... 338,125 .................. (re. $208,382) 29 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 30 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 31 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 32 Contractual services ... 10,200 ........................ (re. $10,200) 33 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 34 ations. 73 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ... 14,000 ......................... (re. $104) 3 Contractual services ... 109,000 ....................... (re. $35,185) 4 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $206,855) 5 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 6 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 7 purposes. 8 PERSONAL SERVICE 9 Personal service-regular ... 340,542 .................. (re. $210,300) 10 Temporary service ... 10,000 ........................... (re. $10,000) 11 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 12 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 13 Contractual services ... 10,402 ........................ (re. $10,402) 14 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 15 ations. 16 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 17 Equipment ... 210,000 ................................. (re. $210,000) 18 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 19 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 20 purposes. 21 PERSONAL SERVICE 22 Personal service-regular ... 340,542 .................. (re. $210,300) 23 Temporary service ... 10,000 ........................... (re. $10,000) 24 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 25 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 26 Contractual services ... 10,402 ......................... (re. $6,082) 27 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 28 ations. 29 PERSONAL SERVICE 30 Temporary service ... 10,000 ........................... (re. $10,000) 31 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 32 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 33 Equipment ... 210,000 ................................. (re. $209,240) 74 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 2 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 3 purposes. 4 PERSONAL SERVICE 5 Personal service-regular ... 330,000 .................. (re. $194,119) 6 Temporary service ... 10,000 ........................... (re. $10,000) 7 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 8 Travel ... 1,000 .......................................... (re. $500) 9 Contractual services ... 10,402 ......................... (re. $7,144) 10 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 11 ations. 12 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 13 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $4,414) 14 Equipment ... 210,000 .................................. (re. $80,677) 15 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 16 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 17 purposes ... 341,167 ................................ (re. $177,322) 18 By chapter 51, section 4, of the laws of 2005, as consolidated and reap- 19 propriated: 20 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 21 purposes ............................................ (re. $454,200) 22 INDEPENDENT REDISTRICTING COMMISSION 23 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 24 PERSONAL SERVICE 25 Personal service - regular ... 600,000 ................ (re. $232,508) 26 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 27 Supplies and materials ... 10,000 ....................... (re. $7,820) 28 Travel ... 10,000 ....................................... (re. $9,431) 29 Contractual services ... 500,000 ...................... (re. $452,279) 30 Equipment ... 10,000 .................................... (re. $9,996) 31 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 32 PERSONAL SERVICE 33 Personal service-regular ... 1,200,000 ................ (re. $470,096) 75 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ... 200,000 .................... (re. $198,652) 3 Travel ... 100,000 ..................................... (re. $98,758) 4 Contractual services ... 2,530,000 .................. (re. $2,446,978) 5 Equipment ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $49,860) 6 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 7 PERSONAL SERVICE 8 Personal service-regular ... 1,200,000 ................. (re. $36,170) 9 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 10 Supplies and materials ... 200,000 .................... (re. $198,464) 11 Travel ... 100,000 ..................................... (re. $95,984) 12 Contractual services ... 2,450,000 .................. (re. $1,985,346) 13 Equipment ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $20,228) 14 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 15 PERSONAL SERVICE 16 Personal service-regular ... 500,000 ................... (re. $18,497) 17 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 18 Supplies and materials ... 200,000 .................... (re. $181,019) 19 Travel ... 75,000 ...................................... (re. $50,308) 20 Contractual services ... 1,200,000 .................... (re. $828,028) 21 Equipment ... 25,000 ................................... (re. $11,643) 22 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 23 PERSONAL SERVICE 24 Personal service-regular ... 3,480,000 ................ (re. $652,451) 25 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 26 Supplies and materials ... 200,000 .................... (re. $183,309) 27 Travel ... 200,000 .................................... (re. $181,708) 28 Contractual services ... 60,000 ........................ (re. $60,000) 29 Equipment ... 60,000 ................................... (re. $10,502) 30 MISCELLANEOUS 31 SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS - OTHER 32 LEGISLATIVE COMPUTER SERVICES FUND 76 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 2 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 3 Contractual services ... 1,000,000 .................. (re. $1,000,000) 4 Equipment ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000) 5 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses of the Legislative Computer Services Fund. 7 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 8 Contractual services ... 1,000,000 .................. (re. $1,000,000) 9 Equipment ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000) 10 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 11 For services and expenses of the Legislative Computer Services Fund. 12 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 13 Contractual services ... 1,000,000 .................. (re. $1,000,000) 14 Equipment ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000) 15 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 16 For services and expenses of the Legislative Computer Services Fund. 17 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 18 Contractual services ... 1,000,000 .................. (re. $1,000,000) 19 Equipment ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000) 20 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 21 For services and expenses of the Legislative Computer Services Fund. 22 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 23 Contractual services ... 1,000,000 .................... (re. $415,414) 24 Equipment ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000) 25 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 26 For services and expenses of the Legislative Computer Services Fund. 27 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 28 Equipment ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000) 29 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 30 For services and expenses of the Legislative Computer Services Fund. 31 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 32 Equipment ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000) 33 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 77 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 1 For services and expenses of the Legislative Computer Services Fund. 2 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 3 Equipment ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000) 4 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 5 For services and expenses of the Legislative Computer Services Fund. 6 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 7 Equipment ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $366,119) 8 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 9 For services and expenses of the Legislative Computer Services Fund. 10 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 11 Equipment ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $186,471) 12 SENATE RECYCLABLE MATERIALS, INFORMATION 13 SERVICES AND CONFERENCE FUND 14 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 15 For services and expenses ... ... 50,000 ............. (re. $50,000) 16 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 17 For services and expenses ... ... 50,000 ............. (re. $50,000) 18 ASSEMBLY RECYCLABLE MATERIALS, INFORMATION 19 SERVICES AND CONFERENCE FUND 20 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 21 For services and expenses ... ... 50,000 ............. (re. $50,000) 22 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 23 For services and expenses ... ... 50,000 ............. (re. $50,000) 24 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 25 have been in full force and effect on and after April 1, 2026. 78 12651-02-6 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2026-27 TABLE OF CONTENTS AGENCY Page Section 1 THE LEGISLATURE ........................................... 1 Assembly .............................................. 3 Assembly Recyclable Materials, Information Services and Conference Fund ......................... 9 Assembly Ways and Means Committee ..................... 4 Computer Services Fund ................................ 9 Grants and Bequests Fund ............................. 10 Joint Entities ........................................ 4 Ethics Commission .................................... 4 National Conference of State Legislatures ............ 5 Health Service ....................................... 5 Library .............................................. 5 Messenger Service .................................... 6 Bill Drafting Commission ............................. 6 Demographic Research and Reapportionment, Task Force on ....................................... 7 Lieutenant Governor, Office of the ................... 1 Senate ................................................ 2 Senate Recyclable Materials, Information Services and Conference Fund ......................... 9 Independent Redistricting Commission .................. 8 Section 2 THE JUDICIARY ............................................ 11 Section 3 THE JUDICIARY - REAPPROPRIATIONS ......................... 25 Section 4 THE LEGISLATURE - REAPPROPRIATIONS ....................... 35 Section 5 EFFECTIVE DATE ........................................... 77